California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(2) “Other fire extinguishing system” means any system intended to suppress or to extinguish a fire other than by discharging water upon the fire. An “other fire extinguishing system” includes, but is not limited to, a component or application that, solely or primarily for the purposes of fire suppression or extinguishment, is made part of the heating, ventilating, or air-conditioning system of a building or structure, a wet chemical system, or a dry chemical system.

(3) “Fire detection system” means any system or appliance intended to detect combustion, or the products thereof, and to activate an alarm or signal, whether audio, visual, or otherwise, including all equipment used to transmit fire alarm activations and related signals to a remote location. A fire detection system includes any system that serves additional functions, but this section shall only apply with respect to that portion of a system that is for fire detection purposes. No portion of a fire detection system as described in this paragraph shall be deemed to be personal property, or shall be deemed to be excluded from that fire detection system, by reason of being owned or controlled by a person other than the owner of property upon which the fire detection system was constructed or installed.

(4) “Fire-related egress improvement” means any improvement intended to do either of the following:

(A) Provide any new, or improve any existing, means of egress for individuals from a structure, or any portion thereof, in which a fire is in progress, as to which there is an imminent threat that a fire may soon be in progress, or as to which individuals therein might be subjected to health hazards or the risk of physical injury due to a fire elsewhere.

(B) With respect to individuals who for any reason cannot evacuate a structure in which a fire is in progress, provide a means of safeguarding, or increasing the safety of, those individuals until the time that the rescue of those individuals can be effected.

(5) “Existing building” means any building or structure already erected at the time that a fire sprinkler system, other fire extinguishing system, fire detection system, or fire-related egress improvement is constructed or installed in that building or structure.

(d) Any system or improvement referred to in this section shall be deemed to have been constructed or installed on or after November 7, 1984, if the actual construction or installation thereof is completed on or after November 7, 1984, regardless of when the actual construction or installation thereof was commenced or any building permit pertaining thereto was issued.

(e) This section applies only to fire sprinkler systems, other fire extinguishing systems, fire detection systems, and fire-related egress improvements, as defined in this section, that are constructed or installed in an existing building.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 200, Sec. 1.   Effective July 28, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

74.3.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, “newly constructed” does not include the construction, installation, or modification of any portion or structural component of an existing single- or multiple-family dwelling that is eligible for the homeowner’s exemption as described in Section 218, if the construction, installation, or modification is for the purpose of making the dwelling more accessible to a severely and permanently disabled person who is a permanent resident of the dwelling.

(b) For purposes of this section, “a severely and permanently disabled person” is any person who has a physical disability or impairment, whether from birth or by reason of accident or disease, that results in a functional limitation as to employment or substantially limits one or more major life activities of that person, and that has been diagnosed as permanently affecting the person’s ability to function, including, but not limited to, any disability or impairment that affects sight, speech, hearing, or the use of any limbs.

(c) For purposes of this section, “accessible” means that combination of elements with regard to any dwelling that provides for access to, circulation throughout, and the full use of, the dwelling and any fixture, facility, or item therein. The construction of an entirely new addition, such as a bedroom or bath, that duplicates existing facilities in the dwelling that are not otherwise available to the disabled resident solely because of his or her disability, shall be deemed to make the dwelling more accessible within the meaning and for the purposes of this section.

(d) The exclusion provided by this section shall apply only to those improvements or features that specially adapt a dwelling accessibility by a severely and permanently disabled person. The value of any improvement, addition, or modification excluded pursuant to this section shall not include any other functional improvement, addition, or modification to the property unless it is merely incidental to the qualified improvements or features.

(e) The exclusion provided by this section shall not apply to the construction of an entirely new dwelling.

(f) The construction, installation, or modification, with regard to an existing building, for purposes of making the structure more accessible to a disabled person, shall be eligible for exclusion pursuant to this section only if the disabled person, or his or her spouse or legal guardian, submits to the assessor both of the following:

(1) A statement signed by a licensed physician or surgeon, of appropriate specialty which certifies that the person is severely and permanently disabled as defined in subdivision (b), and identifies specific disability-related requirements necessitating accessibility improvements or features.

(2) A statement that identifies the construction, installation, or modification that was in fact necessary to make the structure more accessible to the disabled person.

(g) The assessor may charge a fee to the disabled person or his or her spouse or legal guardian sufficient to reimburse the assessor for the costs of processing and administering the statement required by subdivision (f).

(h) This section shall apply to construction, installations, or modifications completed on or after June 6, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 146, Sec. 191.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

74.5.

(a) For purposes of subdivision (a) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, “newly constructed” and “new construction” does not include that portion of an existing structure that consists of the construction or reconstruction of seismic retrofitting components, as defined in this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, all of the following apply:

(1) “Seismic retrofitting components” means seismic retrofitting improvements and improvements utilizing earthquake hazard mitigation technologies.

(2) “Seismic retrofitting improvements” means
 retrofitting or reconstruction of an existing building or structure, to abate falling hazards from structural or nonstructural components of any building or structure including, but not limited to, parapets, appendages, cornices, hanging objects, and building cladding that pose serious danger. “Seismic retrofitting improvements” also means either structural strengthening or providing the means necessary to resist seismic force levels that would otherwise be experienced by an existing building or structure during an earthquake, so as to significantly reduce hazards to life and safety while also providing for the substantially safe ingress and egress of building occupants during and immediately after an earthquake. “Seismic retrofitting improvements” does not include alterations, such as new plumbing, electrical, or other added finishing materials, made in addition to seismic-related work performed on an existing structure. “Seismic retrofitting” includes, but is not limited to, those items referenced in
 Appendix A of the International Existing Building Code of the International Code Council.

(3) “Improvements utilizing earthquake hazard mitigation technologies” means improvements to existing buildings identified by a local government as being hazardous to life in the event of an earthquake. These improvements shall involve strategies for earthquake protection of structures. These improvements shall use technologies such as those referenced in Part 2 (commencing with Section 1.1.1.) of Title 24 of the California Building Code and similar seismic provisions in the International Building Code.

(c) The property owner, primary contractor, civil or structural engineer, or architect shall certify to the building department those portions of the project that are seismic retrofitting components, as defined in this section. Upon completion of the project, the building department shall
 report to the county assessor the costs of the portions of the project that are seismic retrofitting components.

(d) In order to receive the exclusion, the property owner shall notify the assessor prior to, or within 30 days of, completion of the project that he or she intends to claim the exclusion for seismic retrofitting components. The State Board of Equalization shall prescribe the manner and form for claiming the exclusion. All documents necessary to support the exclusion shall be filed by the property owner with the assessor not later than six months after the completion of the project.

(e) The Legislature finds and declares that the reconstruction and improvement actions that were excluded from “newly constructed” and “new construction” by Chapter 1187 of the Statutes of 1983 meet the requirements of “construction or reconstruction of seismic retrofitting components on an
 existing structure,” as provided in the act that amended this subdivision. Therefore, a structure constructed of unreinforced masonry bearing wall construction that is receiving a 15-year new construction exclusion as provided by Chapter 1187 of the Statutes of 1983 on the operative date of this act shall continue to receive, pursuant to this section, an exclusion after the 15-year period expires, unless the property is purchased or changes ownership, in which case Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 60) applies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 5.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

74.6.

(a) For purposes of paragraph (4) of subdivision (c) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, “newly constructed” and “new construction” does not include the construction, installation, removal, or modification of any portion or structural component of an existing building or structure to the extent that it is done for the purpose of making the building or structure more accessible to, or more usable by, a disabled person.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “disabled person” means a person who suffers from a physical impairment that substantially limits one or more of that person’s major life activities.

(c) The exclusion provided for in subdivision (a) shall apply to all buildings or structures except for those buildings or structures that qualify for the exclusion provided for in subdivision (a) of Section 74.3.

(d) The exclusion provided for in this section does not apply to the construction of an entirely new building or structure, or to the construction of an entirely new addition to an existing building or structure.

(e) For purposes of the exclusion provided for in subdivision (a), the property owner, primary contractor, civil engineer, or architect shall submit to the assessor a statement that shall identify those specific portions of the project that constitute construction, installation, removal, or modification improvements to the building or structure to make the building or structure more accessible to, or
 usable by, a disabled person.

(f) For the purposes of the exclusion provided for in subdivision (a), the construction, improvement, modification, or alteration of an existing building or structure may include, but is not limited to, access ramps, widening of doorways and hallways, barrier removal, access modifications to restroom facilities, elevators, and any other accessibility modification of a building or structure that would cause it to meet or exceed the accessibility standards of the 1990 Americans with Disabilities Act (Public Law 101-336) and the most recent edition to the California Building Standards Code that is in effect on the date of the application for a building permit.

(g) In order to receive the exclusion provided for in this section, the property owner shall notify the assessor prior to, or within 30 days of, completion of any project covered by this section
 that he or she intends to claim the exclusion for making improvements of the type specified in subdivision (a). The State Board of Equalization shall prescribe the manner and form for claiming the exclusion. All documents necessary to support the exclusion shall be filed by the property owner with the assessor not later than six months after the completion of the project.

(h) This section applies to any construction, installation, removal, or modification completed on or after June 7, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 351, Sec. 6.   (SB 947)   Effective January 1, 2012.   Note: ACA 8 was adopted as Prop. 177 on June 7, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

74.7.

(a) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 2 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution, “new construction” does not include the repair or replacement of a substantially damaged or destroyed structure on qualified contaminated real property where the remediation of the environmental problems required the destruction of, or resulted in substantial damage to, a structure located on that property. The repaired or replacement structure shall be similar in size, utility, and function to the original structure.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Substantially damaged or destroyed” means the structure sustains physical damage amounting to more than 50 percent of its full cash value immediately prior to the damage.

(2) “Similar in function” means the replacement structure is subject to similar governmental restrictions, including, but not limited to, zoning.

(3) “Similar in size and utility” means the size and utility of the structure are interrelated and associated with its value. A structure is similar in size and utility only to the extent that the replacement structure is, or is intended to be, used in the same manner as the substantially damaged or destroyed structure, and its full cash value does not exceed 120 percent of the full cash value of the replaced structure if that structure was not contaminated. For purposes of this paragraph:

(A) A replacement structure or any portion thereof used or intended to be used for a purpose substantially different than the use made of the replaced structure, shall, to the extent of the dissimilar use, be considered not similar in utility.

(B) A replacement structure or portion thereof that satisfies the use requirement but has a full cash value that exceeds 120 percent of the full cash value of the structure if that property were not contaminated, will be considered, to the extent of the excess, not similar in utility and size.

(4) To the extent that replacement property, or any portion thereof, is not similar in function, size, and utility, the property, or portion thereof, shall have a new base year value determined pursuant to Section 110.1.

(c) Only the owner or owners of the property substantially damaged or destroyed in the process of remediation of the contamination, whether one or more individuals, partnerships, corporations, other legal entities, or a combination thereof, shall receive property tax relief under this section.

(d) In order to receive the exclusion provided for in this section, the property owner shall notify the assessor in writing that he or she intends to claim the exclusion prior to, or within 30 days of, completion of any project covered by this section. All documents necessary to support the exclusion shall be filed by the property owner with the assessor not later than six months after the completion of the property. A claimant shall not be eligible for the exclusion provided by this section unless the claimant provides to the assessor the following information:

(1) Proof that the claimant did not participate in, or acquiesce to, any act or omission that rendered the real property uninhabitable or unusable, as applicable, or is related to any individual or entity that committed that act or omission.

(2) Proof that the qualified contaminated property has been designated as a toxic or environmental hazard or as an environmental cleanup site by an agency of the State of California or the federal government.

(3) The address and, if known, the assessor’s parcel number of the qualified contaminated property.

(4) The date of the claimant’s purchase and the date of completion of new construction.

(e) This section applies to new construction completed on or after January 1, 1995.

(History: Added by Stats. 2003, Ch. 471, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

74.8.

(a) “Newly constructed” and “new construction” do not include the construction or addition of a rain water capture system.

(b) For purposes of this section, “rain water capture system” means a facility designed to capture, retain, and store rain water flowing off a building rooftop or other manmade aboveground hard surface for subsequent onsite use.

(c) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, for purposes of this section, “the construction or addition of a rain water capture system” includes the construction of a rain water capture system incorporated by the owner-builder in the initial construction of a
 new building that the owner-builder does not intend to occupy or use. 

(2) The exclusion provided by this section applies to the initial purchaser who purchased the new building from the owner-builder only if the owner-builder did not receive an exclusion pursuant to this section for the same rain water capture system and only if the initial purchaser purchased the new building prior to that building become subject to reassessment to the owner-builder, as described in subdivision (d) of Section 75.12.

(d) This section shall be administered as follows:

(1) The initial purchaser of the new building shall file a claim with the assessor and provide to the assessor any documents necessary to identify the value
 attributable to the rain water capture system included in the purchase price of the new building. The claim shall also identify the amount of any rebate for the rain water capture system provided to either the owner-builder or the initial purchaser.

(2) The assessor shall evaluate the claim and determine the portion of the purchase price that is attributable to the rain water capture system. The assessor shall then reduce the new base year value established as a result of the change in ownership of the new building by an amount equal to the difference between the following two amounts:

(A) That portion of the value of the new building attributable to the rain water capture system.

(B) The total amount of all rebates, if
 any, described in paragraph (1) that were provided to either the owner-builder or the initial purchaser.

(3) The extension of the new construction exclusion to the initial purchaser of a new constructed new building shall remain in effect only until there is a subsequent change in ownership of the new building.

(e) This section applies to new construction completed on or after January 1, 2019.

(f) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 1, Sec. 1.   (SB 558)   Effective January 31, 2018.   Adding action operative if Proposition 72 is approved at the June 5, 2018 election, pursuant to Stats. 2018, Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Added section operative January 1, 2019, pursuant to Stats. 2018, Ch. 1, Sec. 5.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3.5. Change in Ownership and New Construction After the Lien Date [75. - 75.80.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions and General Provisions [75. - 75.9.]

75.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to fully implement Article XIIIA of the California Constitution and to promote increased equity among taxpayers by enrolling and making adjustments of taxes resulting from changes in assessed value due to changes in ownership and completion of new construction at the time they occur. The Legislature finds and declares that under the law in effect prior to the enactment of this chapter, recognition of these increases is delayed from four to 16 months, which results in an unwarranted reduction of taxes for some taxpayers with a proportionate and inequitable shift of the tax burden to other taxpayers.

It is also the intent of the Legislature that the provisions of this chapter shall be limited to assessments on the supplemental roll which are authorized by the provisions of this chapter and none of its provisions shall be applied, construed, or used as a basis for interpreting legislative intent when determining the effect of any other provision of this division. The Legislature finds and declares that the supplemental assessment system created by this chapter involves practical tax administration considerations which require unique solutions. Except as expressly provided in Article 2.5 (commencing with Section 75.18), these solutions are not appropriate to the general assessment of property under the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 401) of Part 2 and the adoption of the supplemental roll assessment system is not intended to affect the valuation or assessment provisions applicable to the regular assessment roll.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.1.

Except where the context or the specific provisions of this chapter otherwise require, all of the following apply:

(a) The definitions in this article govern the construction of this chapter. 

(b) The other provisions of this division apply to assessments made pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The taxes due pursuant to this chapter are in addition to any other taxes due under this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 133.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.2.

“Current roll” means the roll for the fiscal year during which the change in ownership occurs or the new construction is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 133.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.3.

“The roll being prepared” means the roll for the fiscal year following the fiscal year in which the change in ownership occurs or the new construction is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 133.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.4.

“Current tax rate” means the tax rate applicable to the current roll, including any rate in excess of the limitation prescribed by subdivision (a) of Section 1 of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1102, Sec. 1.5.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.5.

“Property” means and includes manufactured homes subject to taxation under Part 13 (commencing with Section 5800) and real property, other than the following:

(a) Fixtures that are normally valued as a separate appraisal unit from a structure.

(b) Newly created taxable possessory interests, established by month-to-month agreements in publicly owned real property, having a full cash value of fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or less.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 406, Sec. 1.   Effective September 12, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

75.6.

“Fiscal year” means a fiscal year beginning July 1 and ending June 30.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 133.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.7.

“Supplemental roll” means the roll prepared or amended in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and containing properties which have changed ownership or had new construction completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 133.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.8.

“New base year value” means the full cash value of property on the date it changes ownership or of new construction on the date it is completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 498, Sec. 133.   Effective July 28, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.9.

“Taxable value” means the base year full value adjusted for any given lien date as required by law or the full cash value for the same date, whichever is less. In the case of real property which, prior to the date of the change in ownership or completion of new construction, was assessed by the board pursuant to Section 19 of Article XIII of the California Constitution, “taxable value” means that portion of the state-assessed value determined by the board to be properly allocable to the property which is subject to the supplemental assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 498, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessments on the Supplemental Roll [75.10. - 75.15.]

75.10.

(a) Commencing with the 1983–84 assessment year and each assessment year thereafter, whenever a change in ownership occurs or new construction resulting from actual physical new construction on the site is completed, the assessor shall appraise the property changing ownership or the new construction at its full cash value (except as provided in Section 68 and subdivision (b) of this section) on the date the change in ownership occurs or the new construction is completed. The value so determined shall be the new base year value of the property or the new construction.

(b) For purposes of this chapter, “actual physical new construction” includes the removal of a structure from land. The new base year value of the remaining property (after the removal of the structure) shall be determined in the same manner as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 51.

(c) For purposes of this section, “actual physical new construction” includes the discovery of previously unknown reserves of oil or gas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 940, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

75.11.

(a) If the change in ownership occurs or the new construction is completed on or after January 1 but on or before May 31, then there shall be two supplemental assessments placed on the supplemental roll. The first supplemental assessment shall be the difference between the new base year value and the taxable value on the current roll. In the case of a change in ownership of the full interest in the real property, the second supplemental assessment shall be the difference between the new base year value and the taxable value to be enrolled on the roll being prepared. If the change in ownership is of only a partial interest in the real property, the second supplemental assessment shall be the difference
 between the sum of the new base year value of the portion transferred plus the taxable value on the roll being prepared of the remainder of the property and the taxable value on the roll being prepared of the whole property. For new construction, the second supplemental assessment shall be the value change due to the new construction.

(b) If the change in ownership occurs or the new construction is completed on or after June 1 but before the succeeding January 1, then the supplemental assessment placed on the supplemental roll shall be the difference between the new base year value and the taxable value on the current roll.

(c) If there are multiple changes in ownership or multiple completions of new construction, or both, with respect to the same real property during the same
 assessment year, then there shall be a net supplemental assessment placed on the supplemental roll, in addition to the assessment pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b). The net supplemental assessment shall be the most recent new base year value less the sum of (1) the previous entry or entries placed on the supplemental roll computed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b), and (2) the corresponding taxable value on the current roll or the taxable value to be entered on the roll being prepared, or both, depending on the date or dates the change of ownership occurs or new construction is completed as specified in subdivisions (a) and (b).

(d) No supplemental assessment authorized by this section shall be valid, or have any force or effect, unless it is placed on the supplemental roll on or before the applicable date specified in paragraph
 (1), (2), (3), or (4), as follows:

(1) The fourth July 1 following the July 1 of the assessment year in which the event giving rise to the supplemental assessment occurred.

(2) The eighth July 1 following the July 1 of the assessment year in which the event giving rise to the supplemental assessment occurred, if the penalty provided for in Section 504 is added to the assessment.

(3) The eighth July 1 following the July 1 of the assessment year in which the event giving rise to the supplemental assessment occurred, if the change in ownership was unrecorded and a change in ownership statement required by Section 480 or preliminary change in ownership report, as required by Section 480.3, was not timely filed.

(4) Notwithstanding any other law, in the case where property that is owned by a community land trust and was previously exempt pursuant to Section 214.18 becomes subject to taxation pursuant to subdivision (d) of that section, any assessment made in the amount of an exemption, or that portion of the exemption, previously allowed pursuant to Section 214.18 shall be made within five years of the lien date following the date on which the property becomes subject to taxation.

(5) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1), (2), (3), and (4), there shall be no limitation period on making a supplemental assessment, if the penalty provided for in Section 503 is added to the assessment.

For the purposes of this subdivision, “assessment year” means the period
 beginning annually as of 12:01 a.m. on the first day of January and ending immediately prior to the succeeding first day of January.

(e) If, before the expiration of the applicable period specified in subdivision (d) for making a supplemental assessment, the taxpayer and the assessor agree in writing to extend the period for making a supplemental assessment, correction, or claim for refund, a supplemental assessment may be made at any time prior to the expiration of that extended period. The extended period may be further extended by successive written agreements entered into prior to the expiration of the most recent extension.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 669, Sec. 2.   (SB 196)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

75.12.

(a) For the purposes of this chapter, new construction shall be deemed completed on the earliest of the following dates:

(1) (A) The date upon which the new construction is available for use by the owner, unless the owner does not intend to occupy or use the property. The owner shall notify the assessor prior to, or within 30 days of, the date of commencement of construction that he or she does not intend to occupy or use the property. If the owner does not notify the assessor as provided in this subdivision, the date shall be conclusively presumed to be the date of completion.

(B) Notwithstanding
 subparagraph (A), an owner is not required to provide the notice described in subparagraph (A) and it is rebuttably presumed that a supplemental assessment is not required on property described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, if the owner’s property meets all of the following conditions:

(i) The property is subdivided into five or more parcels in accordance with the Subdivision Map Act (Division 2 (commencing with Section 66410) of Title 7 of the Government Code), or any successor to that law.

(ii) A map describing the parcels has been recorded.

(iii) Zoning regulations that are applicable to the parcels or building permits for the parcels require that, except for parcels dedicated for public use, single-family residences will be constructed on the parcels.

(2) If the owner does not intend to occupy or use the property, the date the property is occupied or used with the owner’s consent.

(3) If the property cannot be functionally used or occupied on the date it is available for use considering the type of property and any special facts and circumstances affecting use or occupancy, the date the property can be functionally used or occupied.

(b) For the purposes of this section:

(1) “Occupy or use” means the occupancy or use by the owner, including the rental or lease of the property, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) Property shall not be considered occupied or used by the owner or with the owner’s consent if the occupancy or use is incidental to an offer for a change of ownership,
 including, but not limited to, use of the property as a model home.

(c) The board, after consultation with the California Assessors’ Association, shall adopt rules and regulations defining the date of completion of new construction in accordance with this section. The rules and regulations shall not define the date of completion in a manner that the date of completion of all new construction is postponed until the following lien date.

(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude the reassessment of that property on the assessment roll for January 1 following the date of completion.

(e) The owner of any property who notifies the assessor pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) that he or she does not intend to occupy or use the property and the owner of any property that meets all of the
 conditions under subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall notify the assessor within 45 days of the earliest date that any of the following occur:

(1) The property changes ownership pursuant to an unrecorded contract of sale.

(2) The property is leased or rented.

(3) The property is occupied or used by the owner for any purpose other than provided in subdivision (b).

(4) The property is occupied or used with the owner’s consent for any purpose other than provided in subdivision (b).

(f) The failure to provide the assessor the notice required by subdivision (e), whether requested or not, shall result in a penalty in the amount specified in Section
 482.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 607, Sec. 3.   (SB 825)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

75.13.

Any supplemental assessment shall not be deemed to be an escaped assessment subject to Section 4837.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 946, Sec. 6.   Effective September 10, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

75.14.

A supplemental assessment pursuant to this chapter shall not be made for any property not subject to the assessment limitations of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution. All property subject to the assessment limitations of Article XIIIA of the California Constitution shall be subject to the provisions of this chapter, except as otherwise provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1102, Sec. 5.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.15.

(a) For fixtures, other than fixtures that are included in a change in ownership or that are included in a structure and are assessed at the completion of the new construction of a structure pursuant to Section 75.12, taxpayers shall report to the assessor once each year at the time the annual property statement is due, on the fixtures added to real property and fixtures removed from real property, the dates of those additions and removals, and the cost of each in the applicable period as follows:

(1) In 1997, the prior 10-month period from March 1 to January 1.

(2) In 1998 and each year thereafter, the prior 12-month period from January 1 to January 1.

This reporting requirement shall not apply to fixtures added or removed on or after the first day of the month following the effective date of the act adding this sentence to this subdivision. One supplemental tax bill shall be prepared for those fixtures based on the cost of the fixtures added and subtracted from real property, the date of each addition or subtraction, and the appropriate tax rate computed pursuant to Section 75.41.

The taxes due from the resulting tax bill shall be collected in the same manner and at the same times as other supplemental tax bills mailed on the same date.

(b) For the purposes of the supplemental roll, taxpayers shall report pursuant to this section only those fixtures which are taxable on the supplemental roll.

(c) This section shall become operative on March 1, 1987.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 499, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2.5. Application of Inflation Rate [75.18. - 75.18.]

75.18.

On and after July 1, 1997, if the actual date of the most recent change in ownership or completion of new construction entered on the supplemental roll occurs between January 1, and June 30, then the new base year value shall be adjusted on the January 1 following the change in ownership or completion of new construction by the inflation factor, which shall be determined as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 51.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 499, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Exemptions [75.20. - 75.24.]

75.20.

A supplemental assessment pursuant to this chapter shall not affect an exemption which had been granted the property for either the current roll or the roll being prepared.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1102, Sec. 6.   Effective September 27, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

75.21.

(a) Exemptions shall be applied to the amount of the supplemental assessment, provided that the property is not receiving any other exemption on either the current roll or the roll being prepared except as provided for in subdivision (b), that the assessee is eligible for the exemption, and that, in those instances in which the provisions of this division require the filing of a claim for the exemption, the assessee makes a claim for the exemption.

(b) If the property received an exemption on the current roll or the roll being prepared and the assessee on the supplemental roll is eligible for an exemption and, in those instances in which the provisions of this division require the filing of a claim for the exemption, the assessee makes a claim for an exemption of a
 greater amount, then the difference in the amount between the two exemptions shall be applied to the supplemental assessment.
